Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1279XS (3) 91 ll/js S.F. 43 Section 1. Section 364.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. a. A city may adopt and enforce an 3 ordinance requiring testing for radon as a condition for the 4 issuance of a new rental permit applied for on or after July 5 1, 2021, or the renewal of a rental permit that expired on or 6 after July 1, 2021, for a single family residence, as defined 7 in section 562A.6, used as a rental property. 8 b. If a city adopts or enforces an ordinance pursuant to 9 paragraph âaâ , the following shall apply: 10 (1) The owner of the rental property must provide a copy of 11 all required radon test results to the city, in a manner set 12 forth by the city, and in accordance with this subsection. 13 (2) If a radon test result is less than four picocuries 14 per liter, the owner shall have the rental property retested 15 in eight years unless there is a habitable bedroom in the 16 basement, in which case the owner shall have the rental 17 property retested in four years. 18 (3) If a radon test result is equal to or greater than four 19 picocuries per liter, the owner shall have a radon mitigation 20 system installed and the rental property retested within ninety 21 days, unless the city provides an extension in writing for 22 good cause. After a radon mitigation system is installed, the 23 owner shall have the rental property retested every eight years 24 thereafter. 25 (4) If a rental property has an existing radon mitigation 26 system, the rental property shall be retested within eight 27 years of the date the last radon test was performed. 28 (5) A prior radon test will meet the requirements of this 29 subsection if the radon test was performed within two years of 30 the filing of the application for a new rental permit or within 31 two years of the expiration of the expired permit. The owner 32 shall have the rental property retested within eight years of 33 the date the prior radon test was performed. 34 c. For purposes of this subsection: 35 -1- LSB 1279XS (3) 91 ll/js 1/ 2 S.F. 43 (1) âRadon mitigation systemâ means a system designed to 1 mitigate the presence of radon in a building installed by a 2 person certified in accordance with chapter 136B. 3 (2) âRadon testâ , âtesting for radonâ , or âretestedâ means a 4 test measuring the amount of radon present in the air performed 5 by a person certified in accordance with chapter 136B. 6